Tennessee, session 114, HB0176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-809(b)(7)(A), is amended by
inserting the language "in writing" immediately after the language "Notify".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0176
001421
- 1 -